Washington statutes.
RCW 18.138.030

Qualifications for certification.

(1) An applicant applying for certification as a certified dietitian or certified nutritionist shall file a written application on a form or forms provided by the secretary setting forth under affidavit such information as the secretary may require, and proof that the candidate has met qualifications set forth below in subsection (2) or (3) of this section.

(2) Any person seeking certification as a "certified dietitian" shall meet the following qualifications:

(a) Be eighteen years of age or older;

(b) Has satisfactorily completed a major course of study in human nutrition, foods and nutrition, dietetics, or food systems management, and has received a baccalaureate or higher degree from a college or university accredited by the Western association of schools and colleges or a similar accreditation agency or colleges and universities approved by the secretary in rule;

(c) Demonstrates evidence of having successfully completed a planned continuous preprofessional experience in dietetic practice of not less than nine hundred hours under the supervision of a certified dietitian or a registered dietitian or demonstrates completion of a coordinated undergraduate program in dietetics, both of which meet the training criteria established by the secretary;

(d) Has satisfactorily completed an examination for dietitians administered by a public or private agency or institution recognized by the secretary as qualified to administer the examination; and

(e) Has satisfactorily completed courses of continuing education as currently established by the secretary.

(3) An individual may be certified as a certified dietician if he or she provides evidence of meeting criteria for registration on June 9, 1988, by the commission on dietetic registration.

(4) Any person seeking certification as a "certified nutritionist" shall meet the following qualifications:

(a) Possess the qualifications required to be a certified dietitian; or

(b) Has received a master's degree or doctorate degree in one of the following subject areas: Human nutrition, nutrition education, foods and nutrition, or public health nutrition from a college or university accredited by the Western association of schools and colleges or a similar accrediting agency or colleges and universities approved by the secretary in rule.

[ 1991 c 3 s 280; 1988 c 277 s 3.]